Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.090

Powers and duties.

The director of agriculture shall exercise all powers and perform all duties prescribed by law with respect to the inspection of foods, food products, drinks, milk and milk products, and dairies and dairy products and the components thereof.

He or she shall enforce and supervise the administration of all laws relating to foods, food products, drinks, milk and milk products, dairies and dairy products, and their inspection, manufacture, and sale.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5104; 1983 c 248 s 8; 1967 c 240 s 9; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.090. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 93; RRS s 10851.]

NOTES:

Commercial feed law: Chapter 15.53 RCW.

Eggs and egg products: Chapter 69.25 RCW.

Food, drugs and cosmetics: Chapter 69.04 RCW.

Honey: Chapter 69.28 RCW.

Weighing commodities in highway transport: Chapter 15.80 RCW.

Weights and measures: Chapter 19.94 RCW.